District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.11

Establishment of Public Planning Capital Project Fund.

(a)

The Public Planning Capital Project Fund is hereby established.

(b)

With each annual capital budget request submitted by the Mayor to the Council in accordance with § 1-204.42, the Mayor shall include as a discrete capital project a public planning fund for which the Mayor shall propose any amount he considers necessary for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (c) of this section.

(c)

Subject to authorization by Congress in an appropriations act, the monies designated for the public planning capital project fund shall be used by the District of Columbia Office of Planning, or its successor, to fund the preparation and development of public planning studies and recommendations for proposed capital projects that will be funded or guaranteed, in part or in whole, by the District government.

(d)

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit or limit the appropriation of additional funds from the revenues of the District for the uses and purposes set forth in this section.

Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 1302, 50 DCR 5668
This section is referenced in § 10-1032.
For temporary (90-day) addition, see § 1302 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1302 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
Short title of title XIII of Law 15-39: Section 1301 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided that title XIII of the act may be cited as the Public Planning Capital Project Act of 2003.